District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.01

Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or income-withholding order issued by a tribunal of another state may be registered in the District for enforcement.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 601, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(2), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 deleted “an” preceding “income-withholding”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 601 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).